sv: Mat, dryck och tobak > Livsmedel > Mjölkprodukter > Kräm: Clotted cream; Matlagningsgrädde; Dubbelgrädde; Färsk grädde; Kaffegrädde; Vispgrädde; Mellangrädde; Växtbaserad grädde; Vispbar grädde
fr: Alimentation, boissons et tabac > Aliments > Produits laitiers > Crème: Crème caillée; Crème de cuisson; Crème double; Crème fraîche; Crème moitié-moitié; Crème entière; Crème légère; Crème végétale; Crème fouettée
sk-SK: Potraviny, nápoje a tabakové výrobky > Potraviny > Mliečne výrobky > Smotana: Zrazená smotana; Smotana na varenie; Plnotučná smotana; Čerstvá smotana; Polotučná smotana; Smotana na šľahanie; Odtučnená smotana; Rastlinná smotana; Smotana na šľahanie
de: Nahrungsmittel, Getränke & Tabak > Lebensmittel > Milchprodukte > Creme: Clotted Cream; Kochsahne; Doppelrahm; Frische Sahne; Kaffeesahne; Schlagsahne; Fettarme Sahne; Pflanzliche Sahne; Schlagsahne
pt-PT: Comida, bebidas e tabaco > Artigos alimentares > Produtos lácteos > Creme: Clotted cream; Natas para culinária; Natas espessas; Creme fresco; Mistura de leite e natas; Natas gordas; Natas ligeiras; Natas de base vegetal; Natas batidas
it: Cibo, bevande e tabacco > Alimenti > Prodotti caseari > Crema: Clotted cream; Panna da cucina; Panna doppia; Crema fresca; Miscela di latte e panna; Panna liquida; Panna leggera; Panna vegetale; Panna montata
fi: Ruoka, juoma ja tupakkatuotteet > Ruokatuotteet > Maitotuotteet > Kerma: Clotted cream -kerma; Ruokakermat; Double cream; Tuorekerma; Half & half -kahvikermat; Kuohukermat; Kevytkermat; Kasvipohjaiset kermat; Vispikerma
pt-BR: Alimentos, bebidas e tabaco > Alimentos > Lacticínios > Creme: Clotted cream; Creme culinário; Creme de leite duplo; Creme fresco; Half and half; Creme de leite fresco; Creme de leite leve; Creme vegetal; Chantilly
hu: Élelmiszerek, italok és dohányáru > Élelmiszertételek > Tejtermékek > Krém: Clotted cream; Főzőtejszínek; Dupla tejszín; Friss krém; Kávétejszín; Habtejszínek; Zsírszegény tejszínek; Növényi tejszínek; Tejszínhab
nb: Mat, drikkevarer og tobakk > Matvarer > Meieriprodukter > Krem: Clotted cream; Matfløte; Double cream; Fersk fløte; Kaffefløte; Kremfløte; Lettfløte; Plantebasert fløte; Kremfløte
es: Alimentación, bebida y tabaco > Alimentos > Lácteos > Crema: Crema cuajada; Crema para cocinar; Crema doble; Nata fresca; Crema mitad y mitad; Crema espesa; Crema ligera; Crema de origen vegetal; Nata para montar
nl: Eten, drinken en tabak > Voedselitems > Zuivelproducten > Crème: Clotted cream; Kookroom; Double cream; Verse room; Koffieroom; Volle room; Lichte room; Plantaardige room; Kookroom
th: อาหาร เครื่องดื่ม และยาสูบ > รายการอาหาร > ผลิตภัณฑ์จากนม > ครีม: คลอตเต็ดครีม; คุกกิ้งครีม; ดับเบิ้ลครีม; ครีมสด; ฮาล์ฟแอนด์ฮาล์ฟ; เฮฟวี่ครีม; ไลท์ครีม; ครีมจากพืช; วิปปิ้งครีม
ja: 食品・飲料 > 食品 > 乳製品 > クリーム: クロテッドクリーム; クッキングクリーム; ダブルクリーム; フレッシュクリーム; ハーフ＆ハーフ; ヘビークリーム; ライトクリーム; 植物性クリーム; ホイッピングクリーム
pl: Żywność, napoje i tytoń > Żywność > Nabiał > Krem: Clotted cream; Śmietana do gotowania; Podwójna śmietana; Śmietanka; Śmietanka half & half; Śmietana kremówka; Lekka śmietanka; Śmietanka roślinna; Bita śmietana
da: Fødevarer, drikkevarer og tobak > Fødevarer > Mælkeprodukter > Fløde: Clotted cream; Madlavningsfløde; Double cream; Frisk fløde; Half & half; Piskefløde; Kaffefløde; Plantebaseret fløde; Flødeskum
sl-SI: Hrana, pijača in tobak > Prehrambeni izdelki > Mlečni izdelki > Smetana: Strjena smetana; Kuharska smetana; Dvojna smetana; Sladka smetana; Poovična smetana; Težka smetana; Lahka smetana; Rastlinska smetana; Smetana za stepanje
ko: 식품/음료/담배 > 식품 > 유제품 > 크림: 클로티드 크림; 요리용 크림; 더블 크림; 생크림; 하프 앤 하프; 헤비 크림; 라이트 크림; 식물성 크림; 휩크림
ro-RO: Alimente, băuturi și tutun > Produse alimentare > Produse lactate > Smântână: Smântână coagulată; Smântână pentru gătit; Smântână grasă; Smântână proaspătă; Amestec de lapte și smântână; Frișcă grasă; Smântână light; Smântână vegetală; Smântână pentru frișcă
hr-HR: Hrana, piće i duhan > Prehrambeni artikli > Mliječni proizvodi > Vrhnje: Zgrušano vrhnje; Vrhnje za kuhanje; Punomasno vrhnje; Svježe vrhnje; Pola i pola; Vrhnje s visokim udjelom mliječne masti; Lagano vrhnje; Vrhnje na biljnoj bazi; Vrhnje za šlag
tr: Yiyecek, İçecekler ve Tütün Mamülleri > Yiyecek Çeşitleri > Süt Ürünleri > Krema: Kaymak; Yemeklik krema; Yoğun krema; Taze Krema; Süt ve krema karışımı; Yağlı krema; Hafif krema; Bitki bazlı krema; Krem Şanti
lt-LT: Maistas, gėrimai ir tabakas > Maisto prekės > Pieno produktai > Grietinėlė: Krešintas kremas; Virimo kremas; Dviguba grietinėlė; Šviežia grietinėlė; Pusė pieno ir pusė grietinėlės; Riebioji grietinėlė; Lengvoji grietinėlė; Augalinė grietinėlė; Plakamoji grietinėlė
vi: Thực phẩm, đồ uống và thuốc lá > Hàng thực phẩm > Sản phẩm sữa > Kem: Kem đông clotted cream; Kem nấu ăn; Kem béo double cream; Kem tươi; Kem half & half; Kem béo heavy cream; Kem nhạt light cream; Kem thực vật; Kem tươi đánh bông
cs: Jídlo, pití a tabák > Potraviny > Mléčné výrobky > Smetana: Clotted cream; Smetana na vaření; Vysokotučná smetana; Čerstvá smetana; Smetana do kávy; Smetana ke šlehání; Nízkotučná smetana; Rostlinná smetana; Smetana ke šlehání
el: Τρόφιμα, ποτά & προϊόντα καπνού > Είδη διατροφής > Γαλακτοκομικά προϊόντα > Κρέμα: Κρέμα clotted; Κρέμα μαγειρικής; Διπλή κρέμα γάλακτος; Φρέσκια κρέμα; Κρέμα half and half; Πλήρης κρέμα γάλακτος; Ελαφριά κρέμα γάλακτος; Φυτική κρέμα; Χτυπημένη κρέμα (σαντιγί)
ru: Продукты, напитки и табачные изделия > Пищевые продукты > Молочные продукты > Сливки: Клоттед-крим; Кулинарные сливки; Сливки двойной жирности; Свежие сливки; Смесь молока и сливок; Жирные сливки; Нежирные сливки; Растительные сливки; Сливки для взбивания
zh-CN: 饮食/烟酒 > 食品 > 乳制品 > 奶油: 凝脂奶油; 烹饪奶油; 双层奶油; 鲜奶油; 半对半奶油; 鲜奶油; 淡奶油; 植物基奶油; 淡奶油
zh-TW: 食物、飲料和菸草 > 食品 > 乳製品 > 鮮奶油: 凝脂鮮奶油; 烹調用鮮奶油; 雙倍鮮奶油; 液態鮮奶油; 鮮奶油與牛奶混合液; 高脂鮮奶油; 低脂鮮奶油; 植物鮮奶油; 打發鮮奶油
bg-BG: Храна, напитки и тютюневи изделия > Хранителни продукти > Млечни продукти > Сметана: Сгъстена сметана; Готварска сметана; Сметана с висока масленост; Крем фреш; Смес от сметана и мляко; Пълномаслена сметана; Нискомаслена сметана; Сметана на растителна основа; Сметана за разбиване
en: Food, Beverages & Tobacco > Food Items > Dairy Products > Cream: Clotted Cream; Cooking Cream; Double Cream; Fresh Cream; Half & Half; Heavy Cream; Light Cream; Plant-Based Cream; Whipping Cream